tr: Çin zilinin ses karakteri: Agresif; Parlak; Karmaşık; Net; Karanlık; Kuru; Pürüzsüz; Kirli; Vintage; Sıcak; Diğer
da: Lydkarakter for china-bækken: Aggressiv; Lys; Kompleks; Klar; Mørk; Tør; Blød; Trashy; Vintage; Varm; Andet
fr: Caractère sonore de la cymbale china: Agressif; Brillant; Complexe; Net; Sombre; Sec; Doux; Trash; Vintage; Chaud; Autre
cs: Zvukový charakter čínských činelů: Agresivní; Jasný; Komplexní; Ostrý; Temný; Suchý; Hladký; Tříštivý; Vintage; Teplý; Jiné
hu: Kínai cintányér hangjának karaktere: Agresszív; Fényes; Komplex; Éles; Sötét; Száraz; Lágy; Zajos; Vintage; Meleg; Egyéb
sk-SK: Charakter zvuku čínskych činelov: Agresívny; Jasný; Komplexný; Ostrý; Temný; Suchý; Hladký; Trashy; Vintage; Teplý; Iné
pl: Charakter brzmienia talerza china: Agresywne; Jasne; Złożone; Selektywne; Ciemne; Suche; Gładkie; Piaszczyste; Vintage; Ciepłe; Inne
de: Klangcharakter des China-Beckens: Aggressiv; Hell; Komplex; Knackig; Dunkel; Trocken; Weich; Trashig; Vintage; Warm; Sonstige
pt-BR: Caráter sonoro do címbalo chinês: Agressivo; Brilhante; Complexo; Nítido; Escuro; Seco; Suave; Sujo; Vintage; Quente; Outro
th: ลักษณะเสียงฉาบจีน: ดุดัน; สดใส; ซับซ้อน; คมชัด; ทุ้ม; แห้ง; นุ่มนวล; แทรชชี่; วินเทจ; อบอุ่น; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Zvočni značaj kitajskih činel: Agresiven; Svetel; Kompleksen; Oster; Temen; Suh; Mehek; Umazan; Starinski; Topel; Drugo
en: China cymbal sound character: Aggressive; Bright; Complex; Crisp; Dark; Dry; Smooth; Trashy; Vintage; Warm; Other
fi: Kiinasymbaalin sointi: Aggressiivinen; Kirkas; Moniulotteinen; Terävä; Tumma; Kuiva; Pehmeä; Roskainen; Vintage; Lämmin; Muu
vi: Đặc điểm âm thanh chũm chọe Trung Quốc: Mạnh mẽ; Sáng; Phức tạp; Sắc nét; Trầm; Khô; Mượt mà; Nhiễu; Cổ điển; Ấm; Khác
bg-BG: Звуков характер на China чинел: Агресивен; Ярък; Комплексен; Отчетлив; Тъмен; Сух; Мек; Траш; Винтидж; Топъл; Друго
sv: Kinacymbalernas ljudkaraktär: Aggressiv; Ljus; Komplex; Krispig; Mörk; Torr; Mjuk; Trashig; Vintage; Varm; Annan
zh-TW: 中國鈸聲音特徵: 強烈; 明亮; 複雜; 清脆; 深沉; 乾燥; 平順; 嘈雜; 復古; 溫暖; 其他
es: Carácter sonoro del platillo china: Agresivo; Brillante; Complejo; Nítido; Oscuro; Seco; Suave; Sucio; Clásico; Cálido; Otro
zh-CN: 中国钹的声音特征: 强劲; 明亮; 复杂; 清脆; 低沉; 干脆; 平滑; 嘈杂; 复古; 温暖; 其他
nb: Kinesisk cymballydkarakter: Aggressiv; Lys; Kompleks; Skarp; Mørk; Tørr; Jevn; Trashy; Vintage; Varm; Annen
ru: Характер звучания чайна-тарелки: Агрессивный; Яркий; Сложный; Четкий; Темный; Сухой; Мягкий; Трэшевый; Винтажный; Теплый; Другой
ja: チャイナシンバルの音色: アグレッシブ; ブライト; コンプレックス; クリスプ; ダーク; ドライ; スムース; トラッシー; ヴィンテージ; ウォーム; その他
ko: 차이나 심벌 음색 특성: 강렬함; 밝음; 복합적; 선명함; 어두움; 드라이; 부드러움; 트래시; 빈티지; 따뜻함; 기타
it: carattere sonoro del piatto cinese: Aggressivo; Brillante; Complesso; Nitido; Scuro; Secco; Morbido; Trash; Vintage; Caldo; Altro
el: Χαρακτήρας ήχου κυμβάλου Κίνας: Επιθετικό; Φωτεινό; Σύνθετο; Κοφτό; Σκοτεινό; Ξερό; Ομαλό; Trashy; Vintage; Ζεστό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Caracterul sunetului cinelului chinezesc: Agresiv; Strălucitor; Complex; Clar; Închis; Sec; Fluid; Trashy; Vintage; Cald; Altele
nl: Chinees bekken geluidskarakter: Agressief; Helder; Complex; Scherp; Donker; Droog; Vloeiend; Trashy; Vintage; Warm; Anders
hr-HR: Zvuk kineskih činela: Agresivno; Svijetlo; Složeno; Jasno; Tamno; Suho; Glatko; Prljavo (trashy); Vintage; Toplo; Ostalo
lt-LT: China lėkštės garso charakteris: Agresyvus; Šviesus; Sudėtingas; Aiškus; Tamsus; Sausas; Švelnus; Triukšmingas; Vintažinis; Šiltas; Kita
pt-PT: Característica sonora do prato chinês: Agressivo; Brilhante; Complexo; Nítido; Escuro; Seco; Suave; Sujo; Clássico; Quente; Outro